Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2021
Unprofessional conduct, defined.

Unprofessional conduct means any departure from or failure to conform to the standards of acceptable and prevailing practice of medicine and surgery or the ethics of the profession, regardless of whether a person, patient, or entity is injured, or conduct that is likely to deceive or defraud the public or is detrimental to the public interest, including, but not limited to:

(1) Performance by a physician of an abortion as defined in subdivision (1) of section 28-326 under circumstances when he or she will not be available for a period of at least forty-eight hours for postoperative care unless such postoperative care is delegated to and accepted by another physician;

(2) Performing an abortion upon a minor without having satisfied the requirements of sections 71-6901 to 71-6911;

(3) The intentional and knowing performance of a partial-birth abortion as defined in subdivision (8) of section 28-326, unless such procedure is necessary to save the life of the mother whose life is endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury, including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the pregnancy itself;

(4) Performance by a physician of an abortion in violation of the Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act; and

(5) Violation of the Preborn Child Protection Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 679;

Laws 2010, LB594, § 16;

Laws 2010, LB1103, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB690, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB814, § 10;

Laws 2023, LB574, § 12.

Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act, see section 28-3,102.

Preborn Child Protection Act, see section 71-6912.